Illinois, session 104th, HB5725.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to 7Treatment Alternatives for Stronger Communities to support its 8pursuit of certification as a Comprehensive Community Mental 9Health Center beginning with the TASC offices in Rockford and 10Peoria. The grant shall support a one-year implementation 11period with allowable expenses including, but not limited to, 12cloud-based information technology services; expert 13consultation; staffing including, management and supervisory 14staff; and the provision of direct service to clients. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.